Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-231
School lands; illegal tax; refund.

Money received by the county treasurers of the several counties within the State of Nebraska on account of taxes wrongfully levied on educational lands of the state held under lease shall be, by the respective county treasurers, repaid without interest to persons who paid the same, or their representatives, upon orders in that behalf made by the county board of the respective counties; but no order shall be made for such repayment except upon the production of the county treasurer's receipt for taxes so paid. The county board of any county where school lands have been wrongfully taxed, and the taxes have not yet been paid, shall order the county treasurer to cancel the same.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 14, p. 306;

R.S.1913, § 5860;

C.S.1922, § 5196;

C.S.1929, § 72-216;

R.S.1943, § 72-231;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 22.